Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 2. State Police Communication System

History.

2022, c. 49.

§ 52-12.
Establishment of State Police communication system.

There shall be established in the Department of State Police a fully integrated police communication system operating through sending and receiving stations or receiving stations only, and such associated equipment as may be necessary, at the headquarters of the Superintendent of State Police and at such substations or detached posts as shall be designated by the Superintendent for the purpose of prompt collection and distribution of information throughout the Commonwealth as the police problems of the Commonwealth may require. Authority is hereby granted to connect such communication system directly or indirectly with similar systems in this or adjoining states.

History.

1938, p. 674; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(233); 2022, c. 49.

Cross references.

As to communication of emergency substantial risk orders, see §

19.2-152.13

et seq.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 49 substituted “STATE POLICE COMMUNICATION SYSTEM” for “BASIC STATE POLICE COMMUNICATION SYSTEM” in the chapter head; in the first sentence, substituted “fully integrated” for “basic coordinating” and deleted “of private line typewriter communication” following “police communication system”; substituted “communication” for “basic” in the last sentence; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of Superintendent of the Department of State Police. —

Provisions governing the Virginia Information Technology Agency and the authority granted to the Superintendent of the Department of State Police may be read in harmony to a certain extent; however, statutes relating to the Superintendent’s control over the system dictate that ultimate control over the Virginia Criminal Information Network must remain with the Superintendent. Further, federal regulations require the Superintendent to retain control over the network. See opinion of Attorney General to Colonel W. Steven Flaherty, Superintendent, Department of State Police, 04-085 (8/17/06).

§ 52-13.
Installation, operation, and maintenance of system; personnel.

The Superintendent of State Police is authorized to install, operate, and maintain the communication system and to employ the necessary personnel for its installation, operation, and maintenance. The persons so employed may be members of the State Police, or other state employees, particularly qualified for the duty they are to perform.

History.

1938, p. 674; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(234); 2022, c. 49.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 49 substituted “communication” for “basic”; and made a stylistic change.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of Superintendent of the Department of State Police. —

Provisions governing the Virginia Information Technology Agency and the authority granted to the Superintendent of the Department of State Police may be read in harmony to a certain extent; however, statutes relating to the Superintendent’s control over the system dictate that ultimate control over the Virginia Criminal Information Network must remain with the Superintendent. Further, federal regulations require the Superintendent to retain control over the network. See opinion of Attorney General to Colonel W. Steven Flaherty, Superintendent, Department of State Police, 04-085 (8/17/06).

§ 52-14.
Availability of system.

The communication system provided for in this chapter may be made available for use by any department or division of state government and by any county, city, town, railroad, or other special police department lawfully maintained by any corporation in the Commonwealth as well as agencies of the federal government, subject to the following terms and conditions:

Application for permission to connect with the communication system shall be made to the Superintendent of State Police on forms to be provided by him;

Such application may be approved by the Superintendent if, as, and when in his discretion such connection is requisite and necessary for the best interests of the entire system;

Upon approval of such application and before the applicant shall be connected with the communication system, such applicant must agree to assume and pay all rentals for sending and receiving stations, or receiving stations only, as may be authorized by the Superintendent for installation within the jurisdiction of the applicant, and any and all costs of installation and operation of such stations; and

The Commonwealth shall pay all rental for necessary wire or circuit mileage required to connect such stations operated by criminal justice agencies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, or the Federal Bureau of Investigation, with the communication system; and

All other agencies shall agree, as a condition of connection or continued service, to assume and pay all rental for necessary wire or circuit mileage required to connect such stations with the communication system.

History.

1938, p. 674; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(235); 1999, c. 150; 2022, c. 49.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, c. 150, cl. 2, effective October 1, 1999, provides: “That the provisions of this act which add subdivision 4 b to §

52-14

shall become effective on October 1, 1999.”

The 1999 amendment

redesignated former subdivisions (1) through (4) as 1 through 4 a, inserted “operated by criminal justice agencies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, or the Federal Bureau of Investigation” in subdivision 4 a, and added subdivision 4 b.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 49 substituted “communication” for “basic” throughout; in the introductory language, deleted “herein” preceding “provided for,” inserted “in this chapter,” and substituted “state” for “the State” and “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth”; added “and” at the end of subdivisions 3 and 4 a; and made a stylistic change.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of Superintendent of the Department of State Police. —

Provisions governing the Virginia Information Technology Agency and the authority granted to the Superintendent of the Department of State Police may be read in harmony to a certain extent; however, statutes relating to the Superintendent’s control over the system dictate that ultimate control over the Virginia Criminal Information Network must remain with the Superintendent. Further, federal regulations require the Superintendent to retain control over the network. See opinion of Attorney General to Colonel W. Steven Flaherty, Superintendent, Department of State Police, 04-085 (8/17/06).

§ 52-15.
Control of system; orders, rules, or regulations.

The communication system shall remain at all times under the physical and operational control of the Superintendent of State Police, and such control may be exercised by him through such member of the Department of State Police as he shall designate for such purpose.

The Superintendent may make and issue such orders, rules, or regulations for the use of the system as are necessary for efficient operation.

History.

1938, p. 675; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(236); 2022, c. 49.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 49 in the first paragraph, substituted “The communication” for “Such basic” and “the Department of State Police” for “his department” and inserted “physical and operational”; and deleted “in his discretion” preceding “are necessary” in the second paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of Superintendent of the Department of State Police. —

Provisions governing the Virginia Information Technology Agency and the authority granted to the Superintendent of the Department of State Police may be read in harmony to a certain extent; however, statutes relating to the Superintendent’s control over the system dictate that ultimate control over the Virginia Criminal Information Network must remain with the Superintendent. Further, federal regulations require the Superintendent to retain control over the network. See opinion of Attorney General to Colonel W. Steven Flaherty, Superintendent, Department of State Police, 04-085 (8/17/06).